Utah statutes.
73-3c-202.   Reuse by a public agency under a contract authorizing the use
of water.
(1)  A public agency may use or contract for the use of reuse water if:
(a)  the domestic wastewater consists of water for which the public agency has
a reuse authorization contract;
(b)  the water right is administered by the state engineer as a municipal
water right;
(c)  the reuse is consistent, under Subsection 73-3c-302(5), with the
underlying water right; and
(d)  the public agency receives approval in accordance with Sections 73-3c-301
and 73-3c-302.
(2)  A change application shall be filed in accordance with Section 73-3-3 if
the public agency proposes a water reuse that is inconsistent with the
underlying water right.
